test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-bydos_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
#  The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-10-22
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Pronoun – быд: # Total Pronoun 'Jokainen / Всякий, любой'
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Nom+Compl: быд
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Acc: быдӧс
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Gen: быдлӧн
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Abl: быдлісь
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Dat: быдлӧ
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ins: быдӧн 
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Com: быдкӧт
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Car: быдтӧг
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cns: быдла
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cmpr: быдся
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ine: быдын
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ela: быдісь
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ill: быдӧ
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Apr: быдлань
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Egr: быдсянь
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Prl: быдӧт
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerI: быдӧдз
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerII: быдви
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIne: быдланьын
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEla: быдланись
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIll: быдланьӧ
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEgr: быдланьсянь
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprPrl: быдланьӧт
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerI: быдланьӧдз
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerII: быдланьви


    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: быдыс
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: быдсӧ
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: быдыслӧн
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: быдыслісь
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: быдыслӧ
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: быднас 
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Com+PxSg3: быдыскӧт
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Car+PxSg3: быдыстӧг
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: быдысла
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: быдысся
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: быдас
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: быдсис
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: быдас
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: [быдыслань, быдланяс]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: [быдыссянь, быдсяняс]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: [быдӧттяс, быдӧттис]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerI+PxSg3: [быдӧдззас, быдӧдззис]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerII+PxSg3: быдысви
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: [быдланяс, быдысланьын]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: [быдланьсис, быдысланись]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: [быдланяс, быдысланьӧ]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: [быдысланьсянь, быдланьсяняс]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: [быдланьӧттяс, быдланьӧттис, быдысланьӧт]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg3: [быдланьӧдззас, быдланьӧдззис, быдысланьӧдз]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg3: быдысланьви


Pronoun – быдӧс: # Total Pronoun 'Kaikki / Всё'
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Nom: быдӧс
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Acc: быдӧс
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Gen: быдӧслӧн
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Abl: быдӧслісь
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Dat: быдӧслӧ
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ins: быдӧсӧн 
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Com: быдӧскӧт
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Car: быдӧстӧг
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cns: быдӧсла
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cmpr: быдӧсся
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ine: быдӧсын
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ela: быдӧсісь
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ill: быдӧсӧ
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Apr: быдӧслань
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Egr: быдӧссянь
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Prl: быдӧсӧт
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerI: быдӧсӧдз
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerII: быдӧсви
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIne: быдӧсланьын
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEla: быдӧсланись
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIll: быдӧсланьӧ
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEgr: быдӧсланьсянь
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprPrl: быдӧсланьӧт
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerI: быдӧсланьӧдз
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerII: быдӧсланьви


    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: быдӧсыс
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: быдӧссӧ
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: быдӧсыслӧн
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: быдӧсыслісь
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: быдӧсыслӧ
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: быдӧснас 
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Com+PxSg3: быдӧсыскӧт
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Car+PxSg3: быдӧсыстӧг
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: быдӧсысла
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: быдӧсысся
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: быдӧсас
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: быдӧссис
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: быдӧсас
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: быдӧсыслань
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: быдӧсыссянь
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: [быдӧсӧттяс, быдӧсӧттис]
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerI+PxSg3: [быдӧсӧдззас, быдӧсӧдззис]
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerII+PxSg3: быдӧсысви
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: [быдӧсысланьын, быдӧсланяс]
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: [быдӧсысланись, быдӧсланьсис]
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: [быдӧсысланьӧ, быдӧсланяс]
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: быдӧсысланьсянь
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: быдӧсысланьӧт
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg3: быдӧсысланьӧдз
    быдӧс+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg3: быдӧсысланьви


Pronoun – быдӧн: # Total Pronoun 'Jokainen / Каждый'
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Nom+Compl: быдӧн
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Acc: быдӧнӧс
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Gen: быдӧнлӧн
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Abl: быдӧнлісь
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Dat: быдӧнлӧ
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ins: быдӧнӧн 
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Com: быдӧнкӧт
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Car: быдӧнтӧг
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cns: быдӧнла
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cmpr: быдӧнся
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ine: быдӧнын
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ela: быдӧнісь
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ill: быдӧнӧ
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Apr: быдӧнлань
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Egr: быдӧнсянь
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Prl: быдӧнӧт
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerI: быдӧнӧдз
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerII: быдӧнви
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIne: быдӧнланьын
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEla: быдӧнланись
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIll: быдӧнланьӧ
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEgr: быдӧнланьсянь
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprPrl: быдӧнланьӧт
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerI: быдӧнланьӧдз
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerII: быдӧнланьви


    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: быдӧнным
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: быдӧннымӧс
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: быдӧннымлӧн
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: быдӧннымлісь
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: быдӧннымлӧ
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: [быдӧннаным, быдӧннымӧн] 
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Com+PxPl1: быдӧннымкӧт
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Car+PxPl1: быдӧннымтӧг
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cns+PxPl1: быдӧннымла
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1: быдӧннымся
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: [быдӧнаным, быдӧннымын]
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: [быдӧнсиным, быдӧннымись]
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: [быдӧнаным, быдӧннымӧ]
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: быдӧннымлань 
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: быдӧннымсянь
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: быдӧннымӧт
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerI+PxPl1: быдӧннымӧдз
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerII+PxPl1: быдӧннымви
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIne+PxPl1: быдӧннымланьын
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEla+PxPl1: быдӧннымланись
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIll+PxPl1: быдӧннымланьӧ
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl1: быдӧннымланьсянь
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl1: быдӧннымланьӧт
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl1: быдӧннымланьӧдз
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl1: быдӧннымланьви


    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: быдӧнныт
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: быдӧннытӧ
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: быдӧннытлӧн
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: быдӧннытлісь
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: быдӧннытлӧ
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: [быдӧннаныт, быдӧннытӧн] 
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Com+PxPl2: быдӧнныткӧт
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Car+PxPl2: быдӧнныттӧг
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: быдӧннытла
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2: быдӧннытся
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: [быдӧнаныт, быдӧннытын]
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: [быдӧнсиныт, быдӧннытісь]
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: [быдӧнаныт, быдӧннытӧ]
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: быдӧннытлань 
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: быдӧннытсянь
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: быдӧннытӧт
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerI+PxPl2: быдӧннытӧдз
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerII+PxPl2: быдӧннытви
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIne+PxPl2: быдӧннытланьын
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEla+PxPl2: быдӧннытланись
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIll+PxPl2: быдӧннытланьӧ
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl2: быдӧннытланьсянь
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl2: быдӧннытланьӧт
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl2: быдӧннытланьӧдз
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl2: быдӧннытланьви


    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: быдӧнныс
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: быдӧннысӧ
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: быдӧнныслӧн
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: быдӧнныслісь
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: быдӧнныслӧ
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: [быдӧннаныс, быдӧннысӧн] 
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Com+PxPl3: быдӧнныскӧт
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Car+PxPl3: быдӧнныстӧг
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: быдӧннысла
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: быдӧннысся
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: [быдӧнаныс, быдӧннысын]
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: [быдӧнсиныс, быдӧннысісь]
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: [быдӧнаныс, быдӧннысӧ]
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: быдӧнныслань 
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: быдӧнныссянь
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: быдӧннысӧт
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerI+PxPl3: быдӧннысӧдз
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerII+PxPl3: быдӧннысви
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIne+PxPl3: быдӧннысланьын
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEla+PxPl3: быдӧннысланись
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIll+PxPl3: быдӧннысланьӧ
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl3: быдӧннысланьсянь
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl3: быдӧннысланьӧт
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl3: быдӧннысланьӧдз
    быдӧн+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl3: быдӧннысланьви
